Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 17 Bucket Shops

6-17-1.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, have the following meanings:

“Bucketing” or “bucket shopping” means:

The making of or offering to make any contract respecting the purchase or sale, either upon credit or upon margin, of any securities or commodities, in which both parties to the contract intend, or the keeper intends, that the contract shall be, or may be, terminated, closed, or settled according to or upon the basis of the public market quotations of prices made on any board of trade or exchange upon which the securities or commodities are dealt in, and without a bona fide purchase or sale of the securities or commodities;

The making of or offering to make any contract respecting the purchase or sale, either upon credit or upon margin, of any securities or commodities in which both parties intend, or the keeper intends, that the contract shall be or may be deemed terminated, closed, or settled when the public market quotations of prices for the securities or commodities named in the contract shall reach a certain figure without a bona fide purchase or sale of the securities or commodities; or

The making of or offering to make any contract respecting the purchase or sale, either upon credit or upon margin, of any securities or commodities in which both parties do not intend, or the keeper does not intend, the actual or bona fide receipt or delivery of the securities or commodities, but do intend, or the keeper does intend, a settlement of the contract based upon the differences in the public market quotations of prices at which the securities or commodities are, or are asserted to be, bought and sold.

“Bucket shop” means any room, office, store, building, or other place where any contract prohibited by this chapter is made, or offered to be made.

“Commodities” mean anything movable that is bought and sold.

“Contract” means any agreement, trade, or transaction.

“Keeper” means any person owning, keeping, managing, operating, or promoting a bucket shop, or assisting to keep, manage, operate, or promote a bucket shop.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, or association, whether acting in his, her, or their own right or as the officer, agent, servant, correspondent, or representative of another.

“Securities” mean all evidences of debt or property and options for the purchase and sale of debt or property, shares in any corporation or association, bonds, coupons, scrip, rights, choses in action, and other evidences of debt or property and options for the purchase or sale of debt or property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1908, ch. 1565, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 353, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 406, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 614, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

6-17-1

.

6-17-2.
Penalties for violations.

Any person who makes or offers to make any contract defined in §

6-17-1

, or who is the keeper of any bucket shop, shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment for not more than one year. Any person who shall be convicted of a second offense shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years. The continuing of the keeping of a bucket shop, by any person, after the first conviction, shall be deemed a second offense under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1908, ch. 1565, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 353, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 406, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 614, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

6-17-2

.

6-17-3.
Ouster of corporation from doing business.

If a domestic corporation shall be convicted of a second offense, the superior court shall have jurisdiction upon an action brought by the attorney general on the part of the state, and if a foreign corporation shall be convicted of a second offense, the superior court shall have jurisdiction in the same manner, to restrain the corporation from doing business in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1908, ch. 1565, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 353, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 406, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 614, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

6-17-3

.

6-17-4.
Furnishing quotations to aid prohibited contract.

Any person who shall communicate, receive, exhibit, or display in any manner any statement of quotations of prices of any securities or commodities with an intent to make or offer to make, or to aid in making or offering to make, any contract prohibited by this chapter, upon conviction shall be subject to the penalties provided in §§

6-17-2

and

6-17-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1908, ch. 1565, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 353, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 406, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 614, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

6-17-4

.

6-17-5.
Disclosure of terms and parties to transactions — Failure to disclose as evidence.

Every person shall furnish, upon demand, to any customer or principal for whom the person has executed any order for the actual purchase or sale of any securities or commodities, either for immediate or future delivery, a written statement containing the names of the persons from whom the property was bought, or to whom it has been sold, as the fact may be, the time when, place where, and the price at which the property was either bought or sold. If the person shall refuse or neglect to furnish the statement within twenty-four (24) hours after the demand, the refusal or neglect shall be evidence that the purchase or sale was bucketing or bucket shopping within the terms of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1908, ch. 1565, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 353, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 406, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 614, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

6-17-5

.